Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB215.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 160.290 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each board of education shall have general control and management of the public
schools in its district and may establish schools and provide for courses and other
services as it deems necessary for the promotion of education and the general health
and welfare of pupils, consistent with the administrative regulations of the
Kentucky Board of Education. Each board shall have control and management of
all school funds and all public school property of its district and may use its funds
and property to promote public education. Each board shall exercise generally all
powers prescribed by law in the administration of its public school system, appoint
the superintendent of schools, and fix the compensation of employees.
(2) Each board shall make and adopt, and may amend or repeal, rules, regulations, and
bylaws for its meetings and proceedings for the management of the schools and
school property of the district, for the transaction of its business, and for the
qualification and duties of employees and the conduct of pupils. The rules,
regulations, and bylaws made by a board of education shall be consistent with the
general school laws of the state and shall be binding on the board of education and
parties dealing with it until amended or repealed by an affirmative vote of a
majority of the members of the board. The rules, regulations, and bylaws shall be
spread on the minutes of the board and be open to the public. The rules, regulations,
and bylaws may include the use of reverse auctions as defined in KRS 45A.070 in
the procurement of goods and leases.
(3) Local boards of education electing to enter into agreements pursuant to the
Interlocal Cooperation Act, KRS 65.210 to 65.300, with other local boards of
education to establish consortia to provide services in accordance with the
Kentucky Education Reform Act of 1990, 1990 Ky. Acts Ch. 476, may transfer real
Page 1 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
or personal property to the consortia without receiving fair market value
compensation. The joint or cooperative action may employ employees transferred
from employment of a local board of education, and the employees shall retain their
eligibility for the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System. The chief state school
officer, under administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education, may
allot funding to an interlocal cooperative board created by two (2) or more local
school districts pursuant to KRS 65.210 to 65.300 to provide educational services
for the mutual advantage of the students in the representative districts. All statutes
and administrative regulations that apply to the use of these funds in local school
districts shall also apply to cooperative boards.
(4) Each board of education shall adopt policies that ensure the school district's
curriculum, textbooks, and instructional materials, including digital learning
materials, remain subject to the open records provisions of KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
The policies shall protect a resident of the Commonwealth's right to fair use of
the records.
Section 2. KRS 160.350 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) After considering the recommendations of a screening committee, as provided
in KRS 160.352, each board of education shall appoint a superintendent of
schools whose term of office shall begin on July 1, following the individual's
appointment. The appointment may be for a term of no more than four (4)
years. In the event a vacancy occurs in the office of superintendent prior to the
expiration of the term set by the board, the term shall expire on the date the
vacancy occurs. Therefore, the board may appoint a superintendent for a new
term as provided in this subsection, which shall begin on the date of the
superintendent's appointment, except when the vacancy occurs after a school
board election and before the newly elected members take office. When a
vacancy occurs during this period, the position shall not be filled until the new
Page 2 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
members take office, but the board may appoint an acting superintendent to
serve a term not to exceed six (6) months. This appointment may be renewed
once for a period not to exceed three (3) months. If a vacancy occurs, a local
board may also appoint an acting superintendent during the period the
screening committee pursuant to KRS 160.352 conducts its business and prior
to the actual appointment of the new superintendent. No superintendent shall
resign during a term and accept a new term from the same board of education
prior to the expiration date of the present term. In the case of a vacancy in the
office for an unexpired term, the board of education shall make the
appointment so that the term will end on June 30.
(b) The board shall set the salary of the superintendent to be paid in regular
installments. Any superintendent whose employment contract with a local
board provides total annual compensation that is greater than the total
annual compensation of the commissioner of education shall be subject to
confirmation by the Senate. The Kentucky Department of Education shall
publish the commissioner of education's total annual compensation on the
department's website.
(2) An individual shall not assume the duties of superintendent in a district until he or
she provides the board of education with a copy of a certificate for school
superintendent issued by the Education Professional Standards Board or its legal
predecessor. A superintendent shall hold a valid certificate throughout the period of
employment. A superintendent shall successfully complete the training program and
assessment center process within two (2) years of assuming the duties of
superintendent. A superintendent shall not serve as director or officer of a bank,
trust company, or savings or loan association that has the school district's funds on
deposit. Following appointment, the superintendent shall establish residency in
Kentucky.
Page 3 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
(3) A superintendent of schools may be removed for cause by a vote of the majority[of
four-fifths (4/5)] of the membership of a board of education[ and upon approval by
the commissioner of education. However, if the dismissal of the superintendent has
been recommended by a highly skilled certified educator pursuant to KRS 158.6455
and the action is approved by the commissioner of education, the board shall
terminate the superintendent's contract]. Written notice setting out the charges for
removal shall be spread on the minutes of the board and given to the
superintendent. A superintendent may petition the Kentucky Board of Education
to review the local board of education's decision at the next regularly scheduled
meeting of the state board. Upon review, if the state board determines that the
local board's decision may have been in error, the state board shall return the
issue to the local board for reconsideration[The board shall seek approval by the
commissioner of education for removing the superintendent. The commissioner of
education shall investigate the accuracy of the charges made, evaluate the
superintendent's overall performance during the superintendent's appointment, and
consider the educational performance of the students in the district. Within thirty
(30) days of notification, the commissioner of education shall either approve or
reject the board's request].
(4) After the completion of a superintendent's first contract or after four (4) years,
whichever comes last, the board of education may, no later than June 30, extend the
contract of the superintendent for one (1) additional year beyond the current term of
employment.
Section 3. KRS 160.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each school district shall be under the management and control of a board of
education consisting of five (5) members, except in counties containing a city of the
first class wherein a merger pursuant to KRS 160.041 shall have been accomplished
which shall have seven (7) members elected from the divisions and in the manner
Page 4 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
prescribed by KRS 160.210(5), to be known as the "Board of Education of ....,
Kentucky." Each board of education shall be a body politic and corporate with
perpetual succession. It may sue and be sued; make contracts; expend funds
necessary for liability insurance premiums and for the defense of any civil action
brought against an individual board member in his official or individual capacity, or
both, on account of an act made in the scope and course of his performance of legal
duties as a board member; purchase, receive, hold, and sell property; issue its bonds
to build and construct improvements; and do all things necessary to accomplish the
purposes for which it is created. Each board of education shall elect a
chair[chairman] and vice chair[chairman] from its membership in a manner
prescribed by the board and for a one (1) year term[term prescribed by the board
not to exceed two (2) years].
(2) No board of education shall participate in any financing of school buildings, school
improvements, appurtenances thereto, or furnishing and equipment, including
education technology equipment without:
(a) First establishing the cost of the project in advance of financing, based on the
receipt of advertised, public, and competitive bids for such project, in
accordance with KRS Chapter 424; and
(b) Establishing the cost of financing in advance of the sale of any bonds,
certificates of participation in any leases, or other evidences of financial
commitments issued by or on behalf of such board. Any bonds, leases,
participations, or other financial arrangements shall not involve a final
commitment of the board until the purchaser or lender involved shall have
been determined by public advertising in accordance with KRS Chapter 424.
(3) No board of education shall make a mortgage, lien, or other encumbrance upon any
school building owned by the board, or transfer title to any such school building as
part of any financing arrangement, without the specific approval of the Department
Page 5 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
of Education, and without the transaction being entered into pursuant to a detailed
plan or procedure specifically authorized by Kentucky statute.
(4) Without the approval of the Department of Education, no board may lease, as
lessee, a building or public facility that has been or is to be financed at the request
of the board or on its behalf through the issuance of bonds by another public body
or by a nonprofit corporation serving as an agency and instrumentality of the board,
or by a leasing corporation. Any lease, participation, or other financial arrangement
shall not involve a final commitment of the board unless and until the purchaser or
lender involved in same shall have been determined by public advertising in
accordance with KRS Chapter 424. No transaction shall be entered into by the
board except upon the basis of public advertising and competitive bidding in
accordance with KRS Chapter 424.
(5) A school district may issue general obligation bonds in accordance with KRS
Chapter 66.
(6) Rental payments due by a board under a lease approved by the Department of
Education in accordance with subsection (4) of this section, and debt service
payments under a general obligation bond issued in accordance with this section,
shall be due and payable not less than ten (10) days prior to the interest due date for
the bonds, notes, or other debt obligations issued to finance the building or public
facility. If a board fails to make a rental payment when due under a lease or a debt
service payment when due for a general obligation bond issue, upon notification to
the Department of Education by the paying agent, bond registrar, or trustee for the
bonds not less than three (3) days prior to the interest due date, the Department of
Education shall withhold or intercept any funds then due the board to the extent of
the amount of the required payment on the bonds and remit the amount to the
paying agent, bond registrar, or trustee as appropriate. Thereafter, the Department
of Education shall resolve the matter with the board and adjust remittances to the
Page 6 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
board to the extent of the amount paid by the Department of Education on the
board's behalf.
(7) Bonds, notes, or leases negotiated to provide education technology shall not be sold
for longer than seven (7) years or the useful life of the equipment as established by
the state technology master plan, whichever is less.
(8) Notwithstanding any requirements of public advertising, competitive bidding, or
approval by the Department of Education, or any administrative regulation
promulgated pursuant to KRS 156.160(1)(o), a local board may authorize the
transfer or sale of the district's real or personal property to another governmental or
quasi-governmental agency in exchange for money or a similar type of property that
equals or exceeds the fair market value of the district property as determined by an
independent appraisal conducted by:
(a) An individual or organization not affiliated with the district or its officers or
employees, using a generally accepted national or professional standard; or
(b) A district's officers or employees using a nationally published valuation of
property based on the most recent edition of the publication.
(9) A board of education shall maintain oversight over the superintendent. The
superintendent shall submit a report on closed investigations of district employees
to the board for the purpose of the board's consideration of board policy and the
evaluation of the superintendent's performance.
Section 4. KRS 160.180 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [As used in this section, "relative" means father, mother, brother, sister, husband,
wife, son, and daughter.
(2) ]A person shall only be eligible for membership on a board of education if the
person:
(a) Has attained the age of twenty-four (24) years;
(b) Has been a citizen of Kentucky for at least three (3) years preceding the
Page 7 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
election and is a voter of the district for which he or she is elected;
(c) Has completed at least the twelfth grade or has been issued a High School
Equivalency Diploma, as evidenced by:
1. An affidavit signed under penalty of perjury certifying completion of the
twelfth grade or the equivalent that has been filed with the nominating
petition required by KRS 118.315; or
2. A transcript evidencing completion of the twelfth grade or the results of
a twelfth grade equivalency examination that has been filed with the
nominating petition required by KRS 118.315;
(d) Does not hold any elective federal, state, county, or city office;
(e) Is not, at the time of his or her election, directly or indirectly interested in the
sale to the board of books, stationery, or any other property, materials,
supplies, equipment, or services for which school funds are expended;
(f) Has not been removed from membership on a board of education for cause;
and
(g) Is not, at the time of his or her election:
1. Assisting, representing, or contracting with an employee of the school
district in employment or legal matters in which the school district is a
party; or
2. An officer or director of an organization that is assisting,
representing, or contracting with an employee of the school district in
employment or legal matters in which the school district is a party[
Does not have a relative employed by the school district, in the case of a
person elected after July 13, 1990. This shall not apply to a board
member holding office on July 13, 1990, whose relative was not initially
hired by the district during the tenure of the board member].
(2)[(3)] (a) A member of a board of education shall be subject to removal from
Page 8 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
office pursuant to KRS 415.050 and 415.060 if, after the election the member:
1. Becomes interested in any contract with or claims against the board, of
the kind mentioned in subsection (1)[(2)](e) of this section;
2. Moves his or her residence from the division for which he or she was
chosen;
3. Attempts to influence the employment of any school employee, except
the superintendent or school board attorney;
4. Is convicted of a felony;
5. Performs acts of malfeasance in performance of duties prescribed by
law;
6. Willfully misuses, converts, or misappropriates public property or funds;
or
7. Does anything that would render the member ineligible for reelection.
(b) In accordance with KRS 7.410, the Office of Education Accountability shall
have the duty and responsibility to investigate current local board of education
members for allegations of conduct prohibited by paragraph (a) of this
subsection. After review and investigation, the Office of Education
Accountability shall refer appropriate matters to the Attorney General.
(3)[(4)] A member of a board of education shall be eligible for reelection unless he or
she becomes disqualified.
(4)[(5)] The annual in-service training requirements for all members of boards of
education in office as of December 31, 2014, shall be as follows:
(a) Twelve (12) hours for members with zero to three (3) years of experience;
(b) Eight (8) hours for members with four (4) to seven (7) years of experience;
(c) One (1) hour of open meetings and open records training every other year;
and
(d)[(c)] Four (4) hours for members with eight (8) or more years of experience.
Page 9 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
The Kentucky Board of Education shall identify the criteria for fulfilling this
requirement.
(5)[(6)] (a) For all members of boards of education who begin their initial service
on or after January 1, 2015, the in-service training requirements shall be:
1. Twelve (12) hours for members with zero to eight (8) years of
experience each year, which shall include a minimum of:
a. One (1) hour of ethics training each year; and
b. One (1) hour of open meetings and open records training within
the first twelve (12) months of initial service and at least once
every four (4) years thereafter; and
2. Eight (8) hours for members with more than eight (8) years of
experience each year, which shall include a minimum of:
a. One (1) hour of ethics training each year; and
b. One (1) hour of open meetings and open records training at least
once every four (4) years.
(b) Training topics for members under this subsection with less than two (2) years
of consecutive service shall include three (3) hours of finance and one (1)
hour of superintendent evaluation within the first two (2) years of service. The
Kentucky Board of Education shall identify criteria for fulfilling this
requirement.
Section 5. KRS 160.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Administrative finding of child abuse or neglect" means a substantiated
finding of child abuse or neglect issued by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services that is:
1. Not appealed through an administrative hearing conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
Page 10 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
2. Upheld at an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B and not appealed to a Circuit Court; or
3. Upheld by a Circuit Court in an appeal of the results of an
administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
(b) "Alternative education program" means a program that exists to meet the
needs of students that cannot be addressed in a traditional classroom setting
but through the assignment of students to alternative classrooms, centers, or
campuses that are designed to remediate academic performance, improve
behavior, or provide an enhanced learning experience. Alternative education
programs do not include career or technical centers or departments;
(c) "Clear CA/N check" means a letter from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services indicating that there are no administrative findings of child abuse or
neglect relating to a specific individual;
(d) "Relative" means father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son and
daughter; and
(e) "Vacancy" means any certified position opening created by the resignation,
dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or death of a certified staff
member of a local school district, or a new position created in a local school
district for which certification is required. However, if an employer-employee
bargained contract contains procedures for filling certified position openings
created by the resignation, dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or
death of a certified staff member, or creation of a new position for which
certification is required, a vacancy shall not exist, unless certified positions
remain open after compliance with those procedures.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 160.346, the school district personnel actions identified
in this section shall be carried out as follows:
(a) All appointments, promotions, and transfers of principals, supervisors,
Page 11 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
teachers, and other public school employees shall be made only by the
superintendent of schools, who shall notify the board of the action taken. All
employees of the local district shall have the qualifications prescribed by law
and by the administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education and
of the employing board. Supervisors, principals, teachers, and other
employees may be appointed by the superintendent for any school year at any
time after February 1 preceding the beginning of the school year. No
superintendent of schools shall appoint or transfer himself or herself to
another position within the school district;
(b) When a vacancy occurs in a local school district, the superintendent shall
submit the job posting to the statewide job posting system described in KRS
160.152 fifteen (15) days before the position shall be filled. The local school
district shall post position openings in the local board office for public
viewing;
(c) When a vacancy needs to be filled in less than fifteen (15) days' time to
prevent disruption of necessary instructional or support services of the school
district, the superintendent may seek a waiver from the chief state school
officer outside of the process established in KRS 156.161. If the waiver is
approved, the appointment shall not be made until the person recommended
for the position has been approved by the chief state school officer. The chief
state school officer shall respond to a district's request for waiver or for
approval of an appointment within two (2) working days; and
(d) When a vacancy occurs in a local district, the superintendent shall conduct a
search to locate minority teachers to be considered for the position. The
superintendent shall, pursuant to administrative regulations of the Kentucky
Board of Education, report annually the district's recruitment process and the
activities used to increase the percentage of minority teachers in the district.
Page 12 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
(3) Restrictions on employment of relatives shall be as follows:
(a) No relative of a superintendent of schools shall be an employee of the school
district. However, this shall not apply to a relative who is a classified or
certified employee of the school district for at least thirty-six (36) months
prior to the superintendent assuming office and who is qualified for the
position the employee holds. A superintendent's spouse who has previously
been employed in a school system may be an employee of the school district.
A superintendent's spouse who is employed under this provision shall not hold
a position in which the spouse supervises certified or classified employees. A
superintendent's spouse may supervise teacher aides and student teachers.
However, the superintendent shall not promote a relative who continues
employment under an exception of this subsection;
(b) [No superintendent shall employ a relative of a school board member of the
district;
(c) ]No principal's relative shall be employed in the principal's school; and
(c)[(d)] A relative that is ineligible for employment under paragraph (a)[,] or
(b)[, or (c)] of this subsection may be employed as a substitute for a certified
or classified employee if the relative is not:
1. A regular full-time or part-time employee of the district;
2. Accruing continuing contract status or any other right to continuous
employment;
3. Receiving fringe benefits other than those provided other substitutes; or
4. Receiving preference in employment or assignment over other
substitutes.
(4) No superintendent shall assign a certified or classified staff person to an alternative
education program as part of any disciplinary action taken pursuant to KRS 161.011
or 161.790 as part of a corrective action plan established pursuant to the local
Page 13 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
district evaluation plan.
(5) No superintendent shall employ in any position in the district any person who:
(a) Has been convicted of an offense that would classify a person as a violent
offender under KRS 439.3401;
(b) Has been convicted of a sex crime as defined by KRS 17.500 or a
misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510;
(c) Is required to register as a sex offender under KRS 17.500 to 17.580;[ or]
(d) Has an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect in records maintained
by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; or
(e) Has been convicted of a violation of KRS 510.120, 510.130, 510.140,
510.148, or 510.150.
(6) Requirements for background checks shall be as follows:
(a) A superintendent shall require the following individuals to submit to a
national and state criminal background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual:
1. Each new certified or classified hire;
2. A nonfaculty coach or nonfaculty assistant as defined under KRS
161.185;
3. A student teacher;
4. A school-based decision making council parent member; and
5. Any adult who is permitted access to school grounds on a regularly
scheduled and continuing basis pursuant to a written agreement for the
purpose of providing services directly to a student or students as part of
a school-sponsored program or activity;
(b) 1. The requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to:
a. Classified and certified individuals employed by the school district
Page 14 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
prior to June 27, 2019;
b. Certified individuals who were employed in another certified
position in a Kentucky school district within six (6) months of the
date of hire and who had previously submitted to a national and
state criminal background check and who have a clear CA/N check
for the previous employment; or
c. Student teachers who have submitted to and provide a copy of a
national and state criminal background check by the Department
of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
through an accredited teacher education institution in which the
student teacher is enrolled and who have a clear CA/N check.
2. The Education Professional Standards Board may promulgate
administrative regulations to impose additional qualifications to meet
the requirements of Pub. L. No. 92-544;
(c) A parent member may serve prior to the receipt of the criminal history
background check and CA/N letter required by paragraph (a) of this
subsection but shall be removed from the council on receipt by the school
district of a report documenting a record of abuse or neglect, or a sex crime or
criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as defined in KRS 17.500, or
as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, and no further procedures
shall be required;
(d) A superintendent may require a volunteer or a visitor to submit to a national
and state criminal history background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual; and
(e) The superintendent of a school district operating under an alternative
transportation plan approved by the Kentucky Department of Education in
Page 15 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
accordance with KRS 156.153(3) shall require the driver of any non-school
bus passenger vehicle authorized to transport students to and from school
pursuant to the alternative transportation plan who does not have a valid
commercial driver's license issued in accordance with KRS Chapter 281A
with an "S" endorsement to:
1. Submit to a national and state criminal background check by the
Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation at least once every three (3) years and a criminal records
check conducted in accordance with KRS 27A.090 in all other years;
2. Submit to drug testing consistent with the requirements of 49 C.F.R. pt.
40;
3. Provide a biannual driving history record check performed by the
Transportation Cabinet;
4. Provide an annual clear CA/N check;
5. Immediately notify the superintendent of any conviction for a violation
under KRS Chapter 189 for which penalty points are assessed; and
6. Immediately notify the superintendent of any citation or arrest for a
violation of any provision of KRS Chapter 189A. The superintendent
shall inform the Kentucky Department of Education of the notification.
(7) (a) If a certified or classified position remains unfilled after July 31 or if a
vacancy occurs during a school term, a superintendent may employ an
individual, who will have supervisory or disciplinary authority over minors,
on probationary status pending receipt of the criminal history background
check and a clear CA/N check, provided by the individual. Application for the
criminal record and a request for a clear CA/N check of a probationary
employee shall be made no later than the date probationary employment
begins.
Page 16 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
(b) Employment shall be contingent on the receipt of the criminal history
background check documenting that the probationary employee has no record
of a sex crime nor as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and receipt
of a letter, provided by the individual, from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services stating the employee is clear to hire based on no administrative
findings of child abuse or neglect found through a background check of child
abuse and neglect records maintained by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 161.720 to 161.800 or any other statute to the contrary,
probationary employment under this section shall terminate on receipt by the
school district of a criminal history background check documenting a record
of a sex crime or as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and no
further procedures shall be required.
(8) The provisions of KRS 161.790 shall apply to terminate employment of a certified
employee on the basis of a criminal record other than a record of a sex crime or as a
violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, or on the basis of a CA/N check
showing an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect.
(9) (a) All fingerprints requested under this section shall be on an applicant
fingerprint card provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The
fingerprint cards shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
from the Department of Kentucky State Police after a state criminal
background check is conducted. The results of the state and federal criminal
background check shall be sent to the hiring superintendent. Any fee charged
by the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be an
amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and
conducting the search.
Page 17 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
(b) Each application form, provided by the employer to an applicant for a
certified or classified position, shall conspicuously state the following: "FOR
THIS TYPE OF EMPLOYMENT, STATE LAW REQUIRES A NATIONAL
AND STATE CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK AND A
LETTER, PROVIDED BY THE INDIVIDUAL, FROM THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES STATING THE APPLICANT
HAS NO ADMINISTRATIVE FINDINGS OF CHILD ABUSE OR
NEGLECT FOUND THROUGH A BACKGROUND CHECK OF CHILD
ABUSE AND NEGLECT RECORDS MAINTAINED BY THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES."
(c) Each application form for a district position shall require the applicant to:
1. Identify the states in which he or she has maintained residency,
including the dates of residency; and
2. Provide picture identification.
(10) Notwithstanding any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary,
when an employee of the school district is charged with any offense which is
classified as a felony, the superintendent may transfer the employee to a second
position until such time as the employee is found not guilty, the charges are
dismissed, the employee is terminated, or the superintendent determines that further
personnel action is not required. The employee shall continue to be paid at the same
rate of pay he or she received prior to the transfer. If an employee is charged with
an offense outside of the Commonwealth, this provision may also be applied if the
charge would have been treated as a felony if committed within the
Commonwealth. Transfers shall be made to prevent disruption of the educational
process and district operations and in the interest of students and staff and shall not
be construed as evidence of misconduct.
(11) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each certified and classified employee of
Page 18 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1150
the school district shall notify the superintendent if he or she has been found by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services to have abused or neglected a child, and if
he or she has waived the right to appeal a substantiated finding of child abuse or
neglect or if the substantiated incident was upheld upon appeal. Any failure to
report this finding shall result in the certified or classified employee being subject
to dismissal or termination.
(12) The form for requesting a CA/N check shall be made available on the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services website.
Section 6. Within 30 days of the effective date of this Act, each superintendent
shall submit a report to the district's local board of education as required under subsection
(9) of Section 3 of this Act for all closed investigations that have been concluded during
the superintendent's current contract.
Page 19 of 19
XXXX 2/18/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed